Hawaii statutes.
§501-2 Judges; assignment of cases.
The administrative judge of the circuit court of the first circuit, subject to
the direction of the chief justice as provided by section 601-2(b)(2)(B), shall
assign all land court matters to such judge or judges of the circuit court of
the first circuit as shall be deemed appropriate. [L 1903, c 56, §3; am L
1909, c 11, §1; am L 1913, c 21, §1; RL 1925, §3192; RL 1935, §5001; RL 1945,
§12601; RL 1955, §342-2; HRS §501-2; am L 1984, c 102, §1]

Case Notes

Land court is tribunal separate and distinct from circuit
court. 20 H. 699, 701; 34 H. 10, 11.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next